Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3512
Sections, how construed.

The provisions of sections 23-3510 to 23-3512 are intended to be cumulative to and not amendatory of sections 23-3501 to 23-3509.

Laws 1947, c. 61, § 3, p. 196;

Laws 1987, LB 134, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.12.